Washington statutes.
RCW 18.11.150

Display of certificate of registration or renewal card required—Penalty.

All auctioneers and auction companies shall have their certificates of registration prominently displayed in their offices and the current renewal card or a facsimile available on demand at all auctions conducted or supervised by the licensee.

A person who violates this section shall be subject to an administrative fine in a sum not exceeding one hundred dollars for each violation.

[ 1986 c 324 s 11; 1982 c 205 s 13.]